Tennessee, session 114, HB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-164, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(h) The director of TennCare shall take those actions the director deems
necessary to enable the bureau of TennCare to make available to an enrollee in Part A
of the Katie Beckett program the option to use the wraparound home- and community-
based services funds allotted to the enrollee by means of a health reimbursement
arrangement. Such actions may include seeking a waiver amendment or new federal
waiver.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1158
002941
- 1 -